District of Columbia statutes.
15-318

Remedies of purchaser upon refusal to deliver possession.

When real property is sold by virtue of an execution, and the judgment debtor or a person claiming under him since the rendition of the judgment is in actual possession of the property and refuses to deliver possession thereof to the purchaser upon demand made therefor, the court, on the application of the purchaser, may:

(1)

require the person so in possession to show cause why possession should not be delivered according to the demand; and

(2)

if good cause is not shown, issue a writ of habere facias possessionem, requiring the marshal to put the purchaser in possession.

If the party in possession alleges under oath a title derived from the judgment debtor prior to the judgment or a title superior to that of the defendant, the writ may not issue, but the purchaser may have his remedy by an action of ejectment or the summary remedy in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia provided for in sections 16-1501 to 16-1505 .

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 527, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(7)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 15-301.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-318.
1973 Ed., § 15-318.